Hawaii statutes.
§425E-1204 Application to existing
relationships. (a) Before December 31, 2004, this chapter
governs only:

(1) A limited partnership formed on or after July 1,
2004; and

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c)
and (d), a limited partnership formed before July 1, 2004, which elects, in the
manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the
partnership agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(c), on and after December 31, 2004, this chapter shall govern all limited
partnerships.

(c) With respect to a limited partnership
formed before July 1, 2004, the following rules apply except as the partners
otherwise elect in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or by law
for amending the partnership agreement:

(1) Section 425E-104(c)
shall not apply and the limited partnership has whatever duration it had under
the law applicable immediately before July 1, 2004;

(2) Sections 425E-601
and 425E-602 shall not apply and a
limited partner has the same right and power to dissociate from the limited
partnership, with the same consequences, as existed immediately before July 1,
2004;

(3) Section 425E-603(4) shall not apply;

(4) Section 425E-603(5) shall not apply and a court
has the same power to expel a general partner as the court had immediately
before July 1, 2004; and

(5) Section 425E-801(3) shall not apply and the
connection between a person's dissociation as a general partner and the
dissolution of the limited partnership is the same as existed immediately
before July 1, 2004.

(d) With respect to a limited partnership that
elects pursuant to subsection (a)(2) to be subject to this chapter, after the
election takes effect the provisions of this chapter relating to the liability
of the limited partnership's general partners to third parties apply:

(1) Before December 31, 2004, to:

(A) A third party that had not done business
with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect; and

(B) A third party that had done business with
the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect only if the
third party knows or has received a notification of the election; and

(2) On and after December 31, 2004, to all third
parties, but those provisions remain inapplicable to any obligation incurred
while those provisions were inapplicable under paragraph (1)(B). [L 2003, c
210, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 184, §31]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next